Utah, session 2026, HB338.
Section 1. Section 53-2d-703 is amended to read:53-2d-703Effective 05/06/26Repealed 07/01/27. Volunteer Emergency Medical Service Personnel Insurance Program -- Creation -- Administration -- Eligibility -- Benefits -- Rulemaking -- Advisory board.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Assigned service area" means the operations subdivisions of a geographical service area that a local government entity creates based on the local government entity's emergency medical services operational needs.(b)"Basic life insurance benefit" means the standard group life insurance benefit offered by PEHP that combines basic life, line-of-duty, accidental death and disability, and dependent coverage into one benefit package.(b)(c)"Basic long-term disability benefit" means a $1,000 monthly benefit arising from a disability determined in accordance with Title 49, Chapter 21, Public Employees' Long-Term Disability Act, and excluding any coverage offered on a pilot basis.(c)(d)"Dental plan" means the same as that term is defined in Section 31A-22-646.(e)"Emergency medical services operations" means an emergency medical services provider's duties, as assigned by the local government entity, including:(i)911 call response in the assigned service area;(ii)standby services for regular operations or special events;(iii)training; and(iv)emergency medical services-related community engagement in the geographical service area.(f)"Geographical service area" means a local government entity's jurisdiction.(d)(g)"Health benefit plan" means the same as that term is defined in Section 31A-1-301.(e)(h)"Local government entity" means a political subdivision that:(i)is licensed as a ground ambulance provider under Part 5, Ambulance and Paramedic Providers, or a quick response provider as designated under Section 53-2d-403; and(ii)does not offer health insurance benefits to volunteer emergency medical service personnel.(f)(i)"PEHP" means the Public Employees' Benefit and Insurance Program created in Section 49-20-103.(g)(j)"Political subdivision" means a county, a municipality, a limited purpose government entity described in Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Special Districts, or Title 17D, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Other Entities, or an entity created by an interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.(h)(k)"Qualifying association" means an association that represents two or more political subdivisions in the state.(i)(l)"Qualifying community" means any of the following located in a county of the second class:(i)a city of the fifth class; or(ii)a town.(2)The Volunteer Emergency Medical Service Personnel Insurance Program shall promote recruitment and retention of volunteer emergency medical service personnel by making insurance available to volunteer emergency medical service personnel in accordance with this section.(3)(a)The bureau shall contract with a qualifying association to create, implement, and administer the Volunteer Emergency Medical Service Personnel Insurance Program described in this section.(b)The qualifying association will create promotional campaigns for the Volunteer Emergency Medical Service Personnel Insurance Program and volunteer emergency medical service recruitment and retention including outreach to local government entities through social media, video production, and other media platforms.(4)Participation in the program is limited to any individual who:(a)is licensed under Section 53-2d-402 as an emergency medical technician, an advanced emergency medical technician, or a paramedic;(b)is able to perform all necessary functions associated with the license;(c)provides emergency medical services under the direction of a local governmental entity:(i)by responding to 20% of calls for emergency medical services inparticipating in at least 20% of emergency medical services operations during a rolling twelve-month period; and(ii)within a qualifying community or a county of the third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class by responding to the number of calls described in Subsection (4)(c)(i); and(iii)(A)as a volunteer under the Fair Labor Standards Act, in accordance with 29 C.F.R. Sec. 553.106; or(B)as a part-time unbenefited employee, as classified by the employing local government entity;(d)if seeking health insurance:(i)(A)is not eligible for a health benefit plan through an employer or a spouse's employer; and(B)is not eligible for medical coverage under a government sponsored healthcare program; or(ii)the individual's premium cost for individual, double, or family coverage through another source exceeds 20% or greater of the premium cost of the program created by this section;(e)if seeking dental insurance:(i)(A)is not eligible for a dental plan through an employer or a spouse's employer; and(B)is not eligible for dental coverage under a government sponsored healthcare program; or(ii)the individual's premium cost for individual, double, or family coverage exceeds 20% or greater of the premium cost of the program created by this section; and(f)resides in the state.(5)(a)A participant in the program is eligible to participate in PEHP in accordance with Subsection (5)(b) and Subsection 49-20-201(3).(b)Health and dental benefits available to program participants under PEHP are limited to health insurance and dental insurance that:(i)covers the program participant and the program participant's eligible dependents on a July 1 plan year;(ii)accepts enrollment during an open enrollment period or for a special enrollment event, including the initial eligibility of a program participant;(iii)if the program participant is no longer eligible for benefits, terminates on the last day of the last month for which the individual is a participant in the Volunteer Emergency Medical Service Personnel Insurance Program; and(iv)is not subject to continuation rights under state or federal law.(c)Within existing appropriations, the Volunteer Emergency Medical Service Personnel Insurance Program may offer basic life insurance and long-term disability insurance to participants to enhance recruitment and retention efforts.(6)(a)The bureau may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to define additional criteria regarding benefit design, eligibility for the program, and to implement this section.(b)The bureau shall convene an advisory board:(i)to advise the bureau on making rules under Subsection (6)(a); and(ii)that includes representation from at least the following entities:(A)the qualifying association that receives the contract under Subsection (3); and(B)PEHP.(7)For purposes of this section, the qualifying association that receives the contract under Subsection (3) shall be considered the public agency for whom the program participant is volunteering under 29 C.F.R. Sec. 553.101.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-21-101 is amended to read:53-21-101Effective 07/01/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Crime scene investigator technician" means an individual employed by a law enforcement agency to collect and analyze evidence from crime scenes and crime-related incidents.(2)"Designated mental health resources liaison" means a non-leadership human resources or other administrative employee designated by a first responder agency who receives and processes a request for mental health resources on behalf of the first responder agency under this chapter.(3)"First responder" means:(a)a law enforcement officer, as defined in Section 53-13-103;(b)an emergency medical technician, as defined in Section 53-2e-101;(c)an advanced emergency medical technician, as defined in Section 53-2e-101;(d)a paramedic, as defined in Section 53-2e-101;(e)a firefighter, as defined in Section 34A-3-11334A-3-101;(f)a dispatcher, as defined in Section 53-6-102;(g)a correctional officer, as defined in Section 53-13-104;(h)a special function officer, as defined in Section 53-13-105, employed by a local sheriff;(i)a search and rescue worker under the supervision of a local sheriff;(j)a forensic interviewer or victim advocate employed by a children's justice centerChildren's Justice Center established in accordance with Section 67-5b-102;(k)a credentialed criminal justice system victim advocate as defined in Section 77-38-403 who responds to incidents with a law enforcement officer;(l)a crime scene investigator technician;(m)a wildland firefighter;(n)an investigator or prosecutor of cases involving sexual crimes against children; or(o)a civilian employee of a first responder agency who has been authorized to view or otherwise access information concerning crimes, accidents, or other traumatic events.(4)"First responder agency" means:(a)a special district, municipality, interlocal entity, or other political subdivision that employs a first responder to provide fire protection, paramedic, law enforcement, or emergency services; or(b)a certified private law enforcement agency as defined in Section 53-19-102.(5)(a)"Mental health resources" means:(i)an assessment to determine appropriate mental health treatment that is performed by a mental health therapist;(ii)outpatient mental health treatment provided by a mental health therapist; or(iii)peer support services provided by a peer support specialist who is qualified to provide peer support services under Subsection 26B-5-102(2)(gg).(b)"Mental health resources" includes, at a minimum, the following services:(i)regular periodic screenings for all employees within the first responder agency;(ii)assessments and availability to mental health services for personnel directly involved in a critical incident within 48 hours of the incident; and(iii)regular and continuing access to the mental health program for:(A)spouses and children of first responders;(B)first responders who have retired or separated from the agency; and(C)spouses of first responders who have retired or separated from the agency.(6)"Mental health therapist" means the same as that term is defined in Section 58-60-102.(7)"Plan" means a plan to implement or expand a program that provides mental health resources to first responders for which the division awards a grant under this chapter.(8)"Retired" means the status of an individual who has become eligible, applies for, and may receive an allowance under Title 49, Utah State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act.(9)"Separated" means the status of an individual who has separated from employment as a first responder from a first responder agency, except as a result of a critical incident involving the first respondermisconduct or disciplinary action.(10)"Small first responder agency" means a first responder agency that:(a)has 10 or fewer employees;(b)is primarily staffed by volunteers; or(c)is located in:(i)a county of the third, fourth, fifth,fifth or sixth class;(ii)a city of the third, fourth, fifth,fifth or sixth class; or(iii)a town.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53-21-102 is amended to read:53-21-102Effective 05/06/26. Mental health services -- Requirement to provide  -- Eligibility -- Confidentiality -- Requests -- Reporting noncompliance -- Designation.(1)As used in this section, "public safety portal" means the data portal created in Section 63A-16-1002.(2)Every first responder agency within the state shall provide or make available mental health resources to:(a)all first responders;(b)the spouse and children of first responders;(c)surviving spouses of first responders whose death is classified as a line-of-duty death under Title 49, Utah State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act;(d)retired or separated first responders for at least three years from the date that the retired or separated first responder requests mental health resources, regardless of any subsequent employment as a non-first responder; and(e)spouses of retired or separated first responders for at least three years from the date that the spouse of the retired or separated first responder requests mental health resources, regardless of any subsequent employment as a non-first responder.(2)(3)All access by first responders and their families to mental health resources shall be kept confidential.(3)(4)A first responder agency shall:(a)annually provide information to all employed first responders regarding:(i)the availability of mental health resources under this section, including:(A)for individuals in addition to the first responders as described in Subsection (1)(2); and(B)subsequent to a separation or retirement;(ii)how to access the mental health resources under this section; and(iii)directions on how to appeal a denial of mental health resources under this section to the department, as provided under Section 53-21-104.3; and(b)(i)assign a designated mental health resources liaison;(ii)inform the department of the identity of the designated mental health resources liaison; and(iii)update the department as to the identity of the designated mental health resources liaison when a new individual is assigned.(5)(a)(i)The department shall annually submit a report to the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee, on or before the date of the committee's November meeting, on first responder agencies' compliance with this section.(ii)The department may fulfill the requirement described in Subsection (5)(a)(i) by conducting a survey of first responder agencies and reporting the first responder agencies' responses related to the first responder agencies' compliance with this section.(b)The department shall submit a copy of the report described in Subsection (5)(a) to the public safety portal as described in Section 63A-16-1002.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53-21-104.1 is amended to read:53-21-104.1Effective 07/01/26. Department may provide certain mental health resources -- Requirements.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Account" means the Mental Health Resources for First Responders Restricted Account created in Section 53-21-105.(b)"Eligible first responder agency" means a small first responder agency that contributes funds to the account in accordance with Section 53-21-105.(1)(2)(a)In accordance with Subsection (4)Subsection (5), the department may, at the department's discretion, provide certain mental health resources to a smallan eligible first responder agency.(b)The mental health resources described in Subsection (1)(a)(2)(a) may include an assessment and availability to mental health services for personnel directly involved in a critical incident within 48 hours of the incident.(2)(3)The department may use a contracted provider to provide the services described in Subsection (1)(2).(3)(4)If a smallan eligible first responder agency elects to receive mental health services as provided under this section, the smalleligible first responder agency shall designate a representative of the small first responder agency who is responsible for providing a timely notification to the department or the department's designee if a critical incident occurs as described in Subsection (1)(b)(2)(b).(4)(5)(a)As provided in Subsection 53-21-103(10), the department may use up to 25% of the remaining grant funds for the mental health resources described in this section, and may discontinue the mental health resources once the available grant funding is depleted.(b)The department may:(i)use funds in the account for the mental health resources described in this section and for administrative support related to providing the mental health resources; and (ii)may discontinue the mental health resources if there are insufficient funds in the account.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53-21-104.3 is amended to read:53-21-104.3Effective 05/06/26. Education -- Complaints -- Investigations.(1)On or before September 1, 2024, the department shall inform all first responder agencies in the state of the requirements described in Section 53-21-102.(2)In addition to the notification required under Subsection (1), the department shall, on the department's website, provide information describing:(a)an individual's eligibility for mental health resources under Section 53-21-102;(b)the statutory definition for mental health resources provided in Section 53-21-101;(c)the designated mental health resources liaison for each first responder agency as described in Subsection 53-21-102(3)(b)53-21-102(4)(b); and(d)how to appeal a denial of mental health resources to the department.(3)(a)The department shall investigate a denial of mental health resources that is received under Subsection (2)(d) to determine whether the denial was in violation of this chapter.(b)If, after an investigation, the department determines that a first responder agency improperly denied mental health resources in violation of this chapter, the department shall notify the first responder agency and provide 60 days for the first responder agency to correct the improper denial.(c)The department shall determine whether a first responder agency has cured the violation within the time described in Subsection (3)(b) and, if the first responder agency has not, the department shall send a letter within a reasonable time identifying the first responder agency and the relevant details of the department's investigation to:(i)the commissioner;(ii)the chairs of the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee; and(iii)the director of the State Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice, who shall refer the matter for investigation under Section 63M-7-204 and may restrict state grant money under Section 63M-7-218.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 53-21-105 is enacted to read:53-21-105Effective 07/01/26. Mental Health Resources for First Responders Restricted Account.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Account" means the Mental Health Resources for First Responders Restricted Account created in this section.(b)"Committee" means the Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice Interim Committee.(c)"Contributing first responder agency" means a small first responder agency that contributes funds to the account.(2)There is created within the General Fund a restricted fund known as the "Mental Health Resources for First Responders Restricted Account."(3)The account consists of:(a)appropriations of the Legislature;(b)amounts deposited into the account in accordance with this section;(c)gifts, grants, donations, or any other conveyance of money that may be made to the account from private sources;(d)the funds described in Subsection 53-21-103(10); and(e)interest earned on money in the account.(4)(a)The account shall earn interest.(b)Interest earned on the account shall be deposited into the account.(5)(a)A small first responder agency may contribute funds to the account.(b)If a small first responder agency contributes to the account, the small first responder agency shall contribute to the account as described in this section.(6)In a fiscal year that begins on or after July 1, 2026, a contributing first responder agency shall annually contribute $25 per first responder employed by the contributing first responder agency.(7)The department shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, for:(a)a process for collecting contributing first responder agency contributions to the account described in this section; and(b)a process for depositing into the account contributing first responder agency contributions described in this section.(8)Subject to appropriations from the Legislature, the department may use money in the account:(a)to provide the mental health resources to an eligible first responder agency as described in Section 53-1-104.1; and(b)for administrative support related to providing the mental health resources described in Section 53-1-104.1.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 63I-1-253 is amended to read:63I-1-253Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Titles 53 through 53G.(1)Section 53-1-122, Road Rage Awareness and Prevention Restricted Account, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 53-2a-105, Emergency Management Administration Council created -- Function -- Composition -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 53-2a-1103, Search and Rescue Advisory Board -- Members -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2030.(4)Section 53-2a-1104, General duties of the Search and Rescue Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 15, Grid Resilience Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Section 53-2d-104, State Emergency Medical Services Committee -- Membership -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Section 53-2d-503, Establishment of maximum rates, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Section 53-5a-302, Concealed Firearm Review Board -- Membership -- Compensation -- Terms -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(9)Section 53-11-104, Board, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Section 53-21-103, Grants to first responder agencies -- Rulemaking, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Subsection 53-21-105(3)(d), describing certain funds related to grants for first responder agencies, is repealed July 1, 2027.(10)(12)Title 53, Chapter 31, Department Interaction With Local Law Enforcement, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)(13)Subsection 53C-3-203(4)(b)(vii), regarding the distribution of money from the Land Exchange Distribution Account to the Geological Survey for test wells and other hydrologic studies in the West Desert, is repealed July 1, 2030.(12)(14)Subsection 53E-1-201(1)(q), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)(15)Subsection 53E-2-304(6), regarding foreclosing a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)(16)Subsection 53E-3-503(5), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)(17)Subsection 53E-3-503(6), regarding coordinating councils for youth in care, is repealed July 1, 2027.(16)(18)Subsection 53E-4-202(8)(b), regarding a standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(17)(19)Section 53E-4-203, Standards review committee, is repealed January 1, 2028.(18)(20)Title 53E, Chapter 6, Part 5, Utah Professional Practices Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2033.(19)(21)Subsection 53E-7-207(7), regarding a private right of action or waiver of governmental immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(20)(22)Section 53F-5-215, Elementary teacher preparation assessment grant, is repealed July 1, 2028.(21)(23)Section 53F-5-219, Local Innovations Civics Education Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(22)(24)Title 53F, Chapter 10, Part 2, Capital Projects Evaluation Panel, is repealed July 1, 2027.(23)(25)Subsection 53G-4-608(2)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(24)(26)Subsection 53G-4-608(4)(b), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(25)(27)Section 53G-9-212, Drinking water quality in schools, is repealed July 1, 2027.(26)(28)Subsection 53G-9-703(4), regarding the parental video presentation concerning student use of technology, is repealed January 1, 2030.(27)(29)Subsection 53H-1-402(1)(j), regarding the Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(28)(30)Section 53H-1-604, Higher Education and Corrections Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(29)(31)Subsection 53H-4-210(3), regarding the creation of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(30)(32)Subsection 53H-4-210(4), regarding the appointment of the members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(31)(33)Subsection 53H-4-210(5), regarding the attorney general designating the chair of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(32)(34)Subsection 53H-4-210(6), regarding the quorum requirements of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(33)(35)Subsection 53H-4-210(7), regarding a formal action of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(34)(36)Subsection 53H-4-210(8), regarding compensation for members of the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(35)(37)Subsection 53H-4-210(9), regarding the support staff for the SafeUT and School Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2030.(36)(38)Section 53H-4-306.1, Definitions -- Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center, is repealed July 1, 2028.(37)(39)Section 53H-4-306.2, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Designation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2028.(38)(40)Section 53H-4-306.3, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Steering committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(39)(41)Section 53H-4-306.4, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Industry advisory board, is repealed July 1, 2028.(40)(42)Section 53H-4-306.5, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Duties of the project director, is repealed July 1, 2028.(41)(43)Section 53H-4-306.6, Electrification of Transportation Infrastructure Research Center -- Project development and strategic objectives -- Reporting requirements, is repealed July 1, 2028.(42)(44)Section 53H-4-307.1, Center for Civic Excellence, is repealed July 1, 2030.(43)(45)Section 53H-4-307.2, Center for Civic Excellence -- Duties -- Authority, is repealed July 1, 2030.(44)(46)Section 53H-4-307.3, Center for Civic Excellence -- Leadership, is repealed July 1, 2030.(45)(47)Section 53H-4-307.4, Center for Civic Excellence -- Faculty, is repealed July 1, 2030.(46)(48)Section 53H-4-307.5, Center for Civic Excellence -- Curriculum, is repealed July 1, 2030.(47)(49)Section 53H-4-307.6, Center for Civic Excellence -- Oversight -- Reporting, is repealed July 1, 2030.(48)(50)Section 53H-4-313, Food Security Council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(49)(51)Section 53H-8-305, Five-year performance goals, is repealed July 1, 2027.(50)(52)Title 53H, Chapter 10, Part 4, Education Savings Incentive Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.

Section 8:
Section 8.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 8(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.CRIMINAL JUSTICEDEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETYITEM 1Department of Public Safety - Programs  OperationsFrom General Fund, One-time(800,000)From Mental Health Resources for First Responders Restricted Account112,500From Mental Health Resources for First Responders Restricted Account, One-time15,000Department Commissioner's Office(672,500)GENERAL GOVERNMENTDEPARTMENT OF GOVERNMENT OPERATIONSITEM 2Department of Government Operations - Division of FinanceFrom Mental Health Resources for First Responders Restricted Account1,900From Mental Health Resources for First Responders Restricted Account, One-time900Financial Reporting2,800Subsection 8(b).Restricted Fund and Account TransfersThe Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer the following amounts between the following funds or accounts as indicated. Expenditures and outlays from the funds to which the money is transferred must be authorized by an appropriation.CRIMINAL JUSTICEITEM 3General Fund Restricted - Mental Health Resources for First Responders AccountFrom General Fund, One-time800,000Mental Health Resources for First Responders Account800,000

Section 9:
Section 9.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting the following sections take effect on July 1, 2026:(a)Section 53-21-101Effective 07/01/26;(b)Section 53-21-104.1Effective 07/01/26; and(c)Section 53-21-105Effective 07/01/26.